src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/comp-nouns_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - apmilbealjuogus: # FirstComponent + MALISLONG 
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Nom: apmilbealjuogus
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Gen: apmilbealjuhkosa
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Acc: apmilbealjuhkosa
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Loc: apmilbealjuhkosis
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Ill: apmilbealjuhkosii
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Com: apmilbealjuhkosiin
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Nom: apmilbealjuhkosat
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Gen: apmilbealjuhkosiid
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Acc: apmilbealjuhkosiid
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Loc: apmilbealjuhkosiin
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Ill: apmilbealjuhkosiidda
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Com: apmilbealjuhkosiiguin
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#juogus+N+Ess: apmilbealjuogusin
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#juogus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: apmilbealjuhkosaš
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#juogus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: apmilbealjuhkosaččaš
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#juogus+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: apmilbealjuogusheapme
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp#juogus+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: apmilbealjuoguslaš
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Nom: apmilbeal-juogus
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Gen: apmilbeal-juhkosa
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Acc: apmilbeal-juhkosa
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Loc: apmilbeal-juhkosis
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Ill: apmilbeal-juhkosii
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Sg+Com: apmilbeal-juhkosiin
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Nom: apmilbeal-juhkosat
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Gen: apmilbeal-juhkosiid
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Acc: apmilbeal-juhkosiid
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Loc: apmilbeal-juhkosiin
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Ill: apmilbeal-juhkosiidda
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Pl+Com: apmilbeal-juhkosiiguin
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Ess: apmilbeal-juogusin
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: apmilbeal-juhkosaš
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Der/Dimin+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: apmilbeal-juhkosaččaš
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Der/Car+A+Sg+Nom: apmilbeal-juogusheapme
    apmilbealli+N+Cmp/Sh+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#juogus+N+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: apmilbeal-juoguslaš


  Noun - beanalihtti: # BEANA SgNomCmp + AIGI
    beana+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Nom: beanalihtti
    beana+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Loc: beanalihtis
    beana+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Ill: beanalihttái
    beana+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#lihtti+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: beanalihtáš
    beana+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Nom: beana-lihtti
    beana+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Loc: beana-lihtis
    beana+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Ill: beana-lihttái
    beana+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtti+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: beana-lihtáš

  Noun - beatnatlihtti: # BEANA SgGenCmp + AIGI
    beana+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Nom:                      [beatnatlihtti,   beatnagalihtti  ]
    beana+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Loc:                      [beatnatlihtis,   beatnagalihtis  ]
    beana+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Ill:                      [beatnatlihttái,  beatnagalihttái ]
    beana+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#lihtti+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom:          [beatnatlihtáš,   beatnagalihtáš  ]
    beana+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Nom:             [beatnat-lihtti,  beatnaga-lihtti ]
    beana+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Loc:             [beatnat-lihtis,  beatnaga-lihtis ]
    beana+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Ill:             [beatnat-lihttái, beatnaga-lihttái]
    beana+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtti+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [beatnat-lihtáš,  beatnaga-lihtáš ]

  Noun - beatnagiidlihtti: # BEANA PlGenCmp + AIGI
    beana+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Nom: beatnagiidlihtti
    beana+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Loc: beatnagiidlihtis
    beana+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Ill: beatnagiidlihttái
    beana+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#lihtti+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: beatnagiidlihtáš
    beana+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Nom: beatnagiid-lihtti
    beana+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Loc: beatnagiid-lihtis
    beana+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtti+N+Sg+Ill: beatnagiid-lihttái
    beana+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#lihtti+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: beatnagiid-lihtáš

  Noun -duovddadilli: # SEAMU SgNomCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: duovddadilli
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen: duovddadili
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: duovddadilláme
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Acc: duovddadili
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: duovddadilis
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: duovddadillái
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Com: duovddadiliin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Nom: duovddadilit
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Gen: duovddadiliid
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Acc: duovddadiliid
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Loc: duovddadiliin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Ill: duovddadiliide
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Com: duovddadiliiguin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Ess: duovddadillin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp#dilli+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: duovddadiláš
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: duovdda-dilli
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen: duovdda-dili
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: duovdda-dilláme
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Acc: duovdda-dili
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: duovdda-dilis
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: duovdda-dillái
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Com: duovdda-diliin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Nom: duovdda-dilit
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Gen: duovdda-diliid
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Acc: duovdda-diliid
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Loc: duovdda-diliin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Ill: duovdda-diliide
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Com: duovdda-diliiguin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Ess: duovdda-dillin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgNom+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: duovdda-diláš

  Noun - duovdagadilli: # SEAMU SgGenCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom:       [duovdagadilli,     duovdatdilli    ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen:       [duovdagadili,      duovdatdili     ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: [duovdagadilláme,   duovdatdilláme  ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Acc:       [duovdagadili,      duovdatdili     ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc:       [duovdagadilis,     duovdatdilis    ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill:       [duovdagadillái,    duovdatdillái   ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Com:       [duovdagadiliin,    duovdatdiliin   ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Nom:       [duovdagadilit,     duovdatdilit    ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Gen:       [duovdagadiliid,    duovdatdiliid   ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Acc:       [duovdagadiliid,    duovdatdiliid   ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Loc:       [duovdagadiliin,    duovdatdiliin   ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Ill:       [duovdagadiliide,   duovdatdiliide  ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Com:       [duovdagadiliiguin, duovdatdiliiguin]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Ess:          [duovdagadillin,    duovdatdillin   ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [duovdagadiláš, duovdatdiláš  ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom:       [duovdaga-dilli,       duovdat-dilli    ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen:       [duovdaga-dili,        duovdat-dili     ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: [duovdaga-dilláme,     duovdat-dilláme  ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Acc:       [duovdaga-dili,        duovdat-dili     ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc:       [duovdaga-dilis,       duovdat-dilis    ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill:       [duovdaga-dillái,      duovdat-dillái   ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Com:       [duovdaga-diliin,      duovdat-diliin   ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Nom:       [duovdaga-dilit,       duovdat-dilit    ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Gen:       [duovdaga-diliid,      duovdat-diliid   ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Acc:       [duovdaga-diliid,      duovdat-diliid   ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Loc:       [duovdaga-diliin,      duovdat-diliin   ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Ill:       [duovdaga-diliide,     duovdat-diliide  ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Com:       [duovdaga-diliiguin,   duovdat-diliiguin]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Ess:          [duovdaga-dillin,      duovdat-dillin   ]
    duovdda+N+Cmp/SgGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: [duovdaga-diláš, duovdat-diláš]

  Noun - duovdagiiddilli: # SEAMU PlGenCmp + ALBMILONGSHORT
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: duovdagiiddilli
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen: duovdagiiddili
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: duovdagiiddilláme
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Acc: duovdagiiddili
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: duovdagiiddilis
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: duovdagiiddillái
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Com: duovdagiiddiliin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Nom: duovdagiiddilit
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Gen: duovdagiiddiliid
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Acc: duovdagiiddiliid
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Loc: duovdagiiddiliin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Ill: duovdagiiddiliide
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Com: duovdagiiddiliiguin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Ess: duovdagiiddillin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp#dilli+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: duovdagiiddiláš
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Nom: duovdagiid-dilli
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen: duovdagiid-dili
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: duovdagiid-dilláme
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Acc: duovdagiid-dili
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Loc: duovdagiid-dilis
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Ill: duovdagiid-dillái
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Sg+Com: duovdagiid-diliin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Nom: duovdagiid-dilit
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Gen: duovdagiid-diliid
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Acc: duovdagiid-diliid
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Loc: duovdagiid-diliin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Ill: duovdagiid-diliide
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Pl+Com: duovdagiid-diliiguin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Ess: duovdagiid-dillin
    duovdda+N+Cmp/PlGen+Cmp/Hyph+Cmp#dilli+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: duovdagiid-diláš
